test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VVW_ikwe_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px1ikwe+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: niikweinaanibaning
     +Px1ikwe+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: niikweinaanibanan
     +Px1ikwe+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: niikweinaanibanag
     +Px1ikwe+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: niikweinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1ikwe+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: niikweinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1ikwe+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: niikweinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1ikwe+PosObv+Pret+Loc: niikweiniibaning
     +Px1ikwe+PosObv+Pret+Obv: niikweiniibanan
     +Px1ikwe+PosObv+Pret+Pl: niikweiniibanag
     +Px1ikwe+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: niikweini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1ikwe+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: niikweini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1ikwe+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: niikweini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1ikwe+PosPl+Pret+Loc: niikweiwaaibaning
     +Px1ikwe+PosPl+Pret+Obv: niikweiwaaibanan
     +Px1ikwe+PosPl+Pret+Pl: niikweiwaaibanag
     +Px1ikwe+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: niikweiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1ikwe+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: niikweiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1ikwe+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: niikweiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2ikwe+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giikweinaanibaning
     +Px2ikwe+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: giikweinaanibanan
     +Px2ikwe+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giikweinaanibanag
     +Px2ikwe+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giikweinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2ikwe+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giikweinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2ikwe+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giikweinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2ikwe+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giikweiniibaning
     +Px2ikwe+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giikweiniibanan
     +Px2ikwe+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giikweiniibanag
     +Px2ikwe+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giikweini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2ikwe+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giikweini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2ikwe+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giikweini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2ikwe+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giikweiwaaibaning
     +Px2ikwe+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giikweiwaaibanan
     +Px2ikwe+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giikweiwaaibanag
     +Px2ikwe+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giikweiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2ikwe+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giikweiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2ikwe+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giikweiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ikwe+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oikweinaanibaning
     +Px3ikwe+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oikweinaanibanan
     +Px3ikwe+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oikweinaanibanag
     +Px3ikwe+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oikweinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3ikwe+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oikweinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ikwe+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oikweinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ikwe+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oikweiniibaning
     +Px3ikwe+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oikweiniibanan
     +Px3ikwe+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oikweiniibanag
     +Px3ikwe+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oikweini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3ikwe+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oikweini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ikwe+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oikweini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3ikwe+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oikweiwaaibaning
     +Px3ikwe+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oikweiwaaibanan
     +Px3ikwe+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oikweiwaaibanag
     +Px3ikwe+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oikweiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3ikwe+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oikweiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3ikwe+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oikweiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefikwe+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iikweinaanibaning
     +PxIndefikwe+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iikweinaanibanan
     +PxIndefikwe+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iikweinaanibanag
     +PxIndefikwe+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iikweinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefikwe+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iikweinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefikwe+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iikweinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefikwe+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iikweiniibaning
     +PxIndefikwe+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iikweiniibanan
     +PxIndefikwe+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iikweiniibanag
     +PxIndefikwe+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iikweini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefikwe+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iikweini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefikwe+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iikweini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefikwe+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iikweiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefikwe+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iikweiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefikwe+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iikweiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefikwe+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iikweiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefikwe+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iikweiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefikwe+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iikweiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: ikweenhimishinaan
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: ikweenhimishini
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: ikweenhimishiwaa
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: ikweensimishinaan
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: ikweensimishini
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: ikweensimishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: ikweenhimishiban
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: ikweenhimish***idig, idog***
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: ikweensimishiban
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: ikweensimish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 7
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: ikweenhimishing
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: ikweenhimishan
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: ikweenhimishag
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: ikweensimishing
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: ikweensimishan
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: ikweensimishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: ikweenhiminaaniban
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: ikweenhiminaan***idig, idog***
     ikwe+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret: ikweenhiminiiban
     ikwe+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: ikweenhimini***idig, idog***
     ikwe+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: ikweenhimiwaaiban
     ikwe+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: ikweenhimiwaa***idig, idog***
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: ikweensiminaaniban
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: ikweensiminaan***idig, idog***
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret: ikweensiminiiban
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: ikweensimini***idig, idog***
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret: ikweensimiwaaiban
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: ikweensimiwaa***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 7
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: ikweenhiminaaning
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: ikweenhiminaanan
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: ikweenhiminaanag
     ikwe+Con+Pos+PosObv+Loc: ikweenhiminiing
     ikwe+Con+Pos+PosObv+Obv: ikweenhiminian
     ikwe+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pl: ikweenhiminiag
     ikwe+Con+Pos+PosPl+Loc: ikweenhimiwaaing
     ikwe+Con+Pos+PosPl+Obv: ikweenhimiwaaan
     ikwe+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pl: ikweenhimiwaaag
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: ikweensiminaaning
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: ikweensiminaanan
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: ikweensiminaanag
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Loc: ikweensiminiing
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Obv: ikweensiminian
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pl: ikweensiminiag
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Loc: ikweensimiwaaing
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Obv: ikweensimiwaaan
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pl: ikweensimiwaaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 6, 7
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: ikweenhimibaning
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: ikweenhimibanan
     ikwe+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: ikweenhimibanag
     ikwe+Con+Pos+VocPl+Loc: ikweenhim***idig, idog***ing
     ikwe+Con+Pos+VocPl+Obv: ikweenhim***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Con+Pos+VocPl+Pl: ikweenhim***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pret+Loc: ikweensimibaning
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pret+Obv: ikweensimibanan
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+Pret+Pl: ikweensimibanag
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Loc: ikweensim***idig, idog***ing
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Obv: ikweensim***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Pl: ikweensim***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6
     ikwe+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: ikweenhishinaaniban
     ikwe+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: ikweenhishinaan***idig, idog***
     ikwe+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret: ikweenhishiniiban
     ikwe+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: ikweenhishini***idig, idog***
     ikwe+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret: ikweenhishiwaaiban
     ikwe+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: ikweenhishiwaa***idig, idog***
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: ikweensishinaaniban
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: ikweensishinaan***idig, idog***
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret: ikweensishiniiban
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: ikweensishini***idig, idog***
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret: ikweensishiwaaiban
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: ikweensishiwaa***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 7
     ikwe+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: ikweenhishinaaning
     ikwe+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: ikweenhishinaanan
     ikwe+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: ikweenhishinaanag
     ikwe+Con+Pej+PosObv+Loc: ikweenhishiniing
     ikwe+Con+Pej+PosObv+Obv: ikweenhishinian
     ikwe+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pl: ikweenhishiniag
     ikwe+Con+Pej+PosPl+Loc: ikweenhishiwaaing
     ikwe+Con+Pej+PosPl+Obv: ikweenhishiwaaan
     ikwe+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pl: ikweenhishiwaaag
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: ikweensishinaaning
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: ikweensishinaanan
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: ikweensishinaanag
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Loc: ikweensishiniing
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Obv: ikweensishinian
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pl: ikweensishiniag
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Loc: ikweensishiwaaing
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Obv: ikweensishiwaaan
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pl: ikweensishiwaaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     ikwe+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: ikweenhishibaning
     ikwe+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: ikweenhishibanan
     ikwe+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: ikweenhishibanag
     ikwe+Con+Pej+VocPl+Loc: ikweenhish***idig, idog***ing
     ikwe+Con+Pej+VocPl+Obv: ikweenhish***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Con+Pej+VocPl+Pl: ikweenhish***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: ikweensishibaning
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: ikweensishibanan
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: ikweensishibanag
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Loc: ikweensish***idig, idog***ing
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Obv: ikweensish***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Pl: ikweensish***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5, 6, 7
     ikwe+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ikweenhinaanibaning
     ikwe+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ikweenhinaanibanan
     ikwe+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ikweenhinaanibanag
     ikwe+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ikweenhinaan***idig, idog***ing
     ikwe+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ikweenhinaan***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ikweenhinaan***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Con+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ikweenhiniibaning
     ikwe+Con+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ikweenhiniibanan
     ikwe+Con+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ikweenhiniibanag
     ikwe+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ikweenhini***idig, idog***ing
     ikwe+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ikweenhini***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ikweenhini***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Con+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ikweenhiwaaibaning
     ikwe+Con+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ikweenhiwaaibanan
     ikwe+Con+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ikweenhiwaaibanag
     ikwe+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ikweenhiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     ikwe+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ikweenhiwaa***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ikweenhiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ikweensinaanibaning
     ikwe+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ikweensinaanibanan
     ikwe+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ikweensinaanibanag
     ikwe+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ikweensinaan***idig, idog***ing
     ikwe+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ikweensinaan***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ikweensinaan***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ikweensiniibaning
     ikwe+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ikweensiniibanan
     ikwe+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ikweensiniibanag
     ikwe+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ikweensini***idig, idog***ing
     ikwe+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ikweensini***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ikweensini***idig, idog***ag
     ikwe+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ikweensiwaaibaning
     ikwe+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ikweensiwaaibanan
     ikwe+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ikweensiwaaibanag
     ikwe+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ikweensiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     ikwe+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ikweensiwaa***idig, idog***an
     ikwe+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ikweensiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6
     ikwe+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: ikweimishinaaniban
     ikwe+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: ikweimishinaan***idig, idog***
     ikwe+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: ikweimishiniiban
     ikwe+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: ikweimishini***idig, idog***
     ikwe+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: ikweimishiwaaiban
     ikwe+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: ikweimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 7
     ikwe+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: ikweimishinaaning
     ikwe+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: ikweimishinaanan
     ikwe+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: ikweimishinaanag
